Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; BEAR STUDY.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the 1854 Treaty Authority to study bear populations in the ceded area described in the September 30, 1854, treaty between the Lake Superior Chippewa and the government of the United States. By December 31, 2026, the 1854 Treaty Authority must submit the results of the study to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees with primary jurisdiction over environment policy. The study must include an assessment of current bear populations in the area, factors likely affecting those populations, and an estimate of future population trends. new text end